Washington statutes.
RCW 20.01.040

License—Generally.

No person may act as a commission merchant, dealer, broker, cash buyer, or agent without a license. Any person applying for such a license shall file an application with the director prior to conducting business pursuant to this chapter. No application shall be considered complete unless an effective bond or other acceptable form of security is also filed with the director, as provided under RCW 20.01.210, 20.01.211, or 20.01.212. Each license issued under this chapter shall require renewal on or before the renewal date prescribed by the director by rule. License fees shall be prorated where necessary to accommodate staggered renewals of a license or licenses. The application shall be accompanied by a license fee as prescribed by the director by rule.

[ 1991 c 109 s 16; 1989 c 354 s 39; 1987 c 393 s 13; 1983 c 305 s 3; 1979 ex.s. c 115 s 3; 1974 ex.s. c 102 s 3; 1971 ex.s. c 182 s 3; 1959 c 139 s 4.]

NOTES:

Severability—1989 c 354: See note following RCW 15.36.012.

Severability—1983 c 305: See note following RCW 20.01.010.